Tennessee, session 114, HB0848.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 42-2-301(f), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision (3):
(3) Study the laws and regulations of other states regarding restrictions on the
operation of drones over private property.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0848
002907
- 1 -